Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1456DP.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1456DP (1) 91
sb/js

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 455B.392, subsection 1, paragraph a,
subparagraph (4), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows:
(4) The excessive and extraordinary cost reasonable costs
incurred by the state or its political subdivisions or the
agents of the state or a political subdivision in responding
for any of the following:
(a) Responding at and to the scene of a hazardous condition
caused by that person.
(b) Oversight and monitoring of a hazardous condition
caused by that person.